Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska39-847.01
State Aid Bridge Fund; State Treasurer; transfer funds to.

The State Treasurer shall transfer monthly thirty-two thousand dollars from the share of the Department of Transportation of the Highway Trust Fund and thirty-two thousand dollars from the counties' share of the Highway Trust Fund which is allocated to bridges to the State Aid Bridge Fund.

Laws 1973, LB 87, § 3;

Laws 1986, LB 599, § 4;

Laws 2017, LB339, § 115.

Highway Trust Fund, see section 39-2215.